Washington statutes.
RCW 42.45.060

Refusal to perform notarial act.

(1) A notarial officer has the authority to refuse to perform a notarial act if the officer is not satisfied that:

(a) The individual executing the record is competent or has the capacity to execute the record; or

(b) The individual's signature is knowingly and voluntarily made.

(2) A notarial officer has the authority to refuse to perform a notarial act unless refusal is prohibited by law other than this chapter.

[ 2017 c 281 s 8.]